engine/dictionaries/is/is.aff
FLAG num
# Lýsingarorðsbeyging djúpur
SFX 314 N 119
SFX 314 pur p .	19
SFX 314 ur t .	20
SFX 314 ur ir .	21
SFX 314 ur ar .	22
SFX 314 pur p .	23
SFX 314 ur an .	24
SFX 314 ur a .	25
SFX 314 ur t .	26
SFX 314 ur a .	27
SFX 314 ur ar .	28
SFX 314 pur p .	29
SFX 314 r m .	30
SFX 314 ur ri .	31
SFX 314 ur u .	32
SFX 314 r m .	33
SFX 314 r m .	34
SFX 314 r m .	35
SFX 314 ur s .	36
SFX 314 ur rar .	37
SFX 314 ur s .	38
SFX 314 ur ra .	39
SFX 314 ur ra .	40
SFX 314 ur ra .	41
SFX 314 ur i .	42
SFX 314 ur a .	43
SFX 314 ur a .	44
SFX 314 ur u .	45
SFX 314 ur u .	46
SFX 314 ur u .	47
SFX 314 ur a .	48
SFX 314 ur u .	49
SFX 314 ur a .	50
SFX 314 ur u .	51
SFX 314 ur u .	52
SFX 314 ur u .	53
SFX 314 ur a .	54
SFX 314 ur u .	55
SFX 314 ur a .	56
SFX 314 ur u .	57
SFX 314 ur u .	58
SFX 314 ur u .	59
SFX 314 ur a .	60
SFX 314 ur u .	61
SFX 314 ur a .	62
SFX 314 ur u .	63
SFX 314 ur u .	64
SFX 314 ur u .	65
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	66
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	67
SFX 314 júpur ýpra .	68
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	69
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	70
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	71
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	72
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	73
SFX 314 júpur ýpra .	74
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	75
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	76
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	77
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	78
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	79
SFX 314 júpur ýpra .	80
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	81
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	82
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	83
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	84
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	85
SFX 314 júpur ýpra .	86
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	87
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	88
SFX 314 júpur ýpri .	89
SFX 314 júpur ýpstur .	90
SFX 314 júpur ýpst .	91
SFX 314 júpur ýpst .	92
SFX 314 júpur ýpstir .	93
SFX 314 júpur ýpstar .	94
SFX 314 júpur ýpst .	95
SFX 314 júpur ýpstan .	96
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	97
SFX 314 júpur ýpst .	98
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	99
SFX 314 júpur ýpstar .	100
SFX 314 júpur ýpst .	101
SFX 314 júpur ýpstum .	102
SFX 314 júpur ýpstri .	103
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	104
SFX 314 júpur ýpstum .	105
SFX 314 júpur ýpstum .	106
SFX 314 júpur ýpstum .	107
SFX 314 júpur ýpsts .	108
SFX 314 júpur ýpstrar .	109
SFX 314 júpur ýpsts .	110
SFX 314 júpur ýpstra .	111
SFX 314 júpur ýpstra .	112
SFX 314 júpur ýpstra .	113
SFX 314 júpur ýpsti .	114
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	115
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	116
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	117
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	118
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	119
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	120
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	121
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	122
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	123
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	124
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	125
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	126
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	127
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	128
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	129
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	130
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	131
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	132
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	133
SFX 314 júpur ýpsta .	134
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	135
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	136
SFX 314 júpur ýpstu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging gamall
SFX 315 N 119
SFX 315 amall ömul .	19
SFX 315 l t .	20
SFX 315 all lir .	21
SFX 315 all lar .	22
SFX 315 amall ömul .	23
SFX 315 all lan .	24
SFX 315 all la .	25
SFX 315 l t .	26
SFX 315 all la .	27
SFX 315 all lar .	28
SFX 315 amall ömul .	29
SFX 315 amall ömlum .	30
SFX 315 0 i .	31
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	32
SFX 315 amall ömlum .	33
SFX 315 amall ömlum .	34
SFX 315 amall ömlum .	35
SFX 315 l s .	36
SFX 315 0 ar .	37
SFX 315 l s .	38
SFX 315 0 a .	39
SFX 315 0 a .	40
SFX 315 0 a .	41
SFX 315 all li .	42
SFX 315 all la .	43
SFX 315 all la .	44
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	45
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	46
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	47
SFX 315 all la .	48
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	49
SFX 315 all la .	50
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	51
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	52
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	53
SFX 315 all la .	54
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	55
SFX 315 all la .	56
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	57
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	58
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	59
SFX 315 all la .	60
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	61
SFX 315 all la .	62
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	63
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	64
SFX 315 amall ömlu .	65
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	66
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	67
SFX 315 gamall eldra .	68
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	69
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	70
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	71
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	72
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	73
SFX 315 gamall eldra .	74
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	75
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	76
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	77
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	78
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	79
SFX 315 gamall eldra .	80
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	81
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	82
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	83
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	84
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	85
SFX 315 gamall eldra .	86
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	87
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	88
SFX 315 gamall eldri .	89
SFX 315 gamall elstur .	90
SFX 315 gamall elst .	91
SFX 315 gamall elst .	92
SFX 315 gamall elstir .	93
SFX 315 gamall elstar .	94
SFX 315 gamall elst .	95
SFX 315 gamall elstan .	96
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	97
SFX 315 gamall elst .	98
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	99
SFX 315 gamall elstar .	100
SFX 315 gamall elst .	101
SFX 315 gamall elstum .	102
SFX 315 gamall elstri .	103
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	104
SFX 315 gamall elstum .	105
SFX 315 gamall elstum .	106
SFX 315 gamall elstum .	107
SFX 315 gamall elsts .	108
SFX 315 gamall elstrar .	109
SFX 315 gamall elsts .	110
SFX 315 gamall elstra .	111
SFX 315 gamall elstra .	112
SFX 315 gamall elstra .	113
SFX 315 gamall elsti .	114
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	115
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	116
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	117
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	118
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	119
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	120
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	121
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	122
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	123
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	124
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	125
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	126
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	127
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	128
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	129
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	130
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	131
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	132
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	133
SFX 315 gamall elsta .	134
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	135
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	136
SFX 315 gamall elstu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging góður
SFX 316 N 119
SFX 316 ður ð .	19
SFX 316 óður ott .	20
SFX 316 ur ir .	21
SFX 316 ur ar .	22
SFX 316 ður ð .	23
SFX 316 ur an .	24
SFX 316 ur a .	25
SFX 316 óður ott .	26
SFX 316 ur a .	27
SFX 316 ur ar .	28
SFX 316 ður ð .	29
SFX 316 r m .	30
SFX 316 ur ri .	31
SFX 316 ur u .	32
SFX 316 r m .	33
SFX 316 r m .	34
SFX 316 r m .	35
SFX 316 ur s .	36
SFX 316 ur rar .	37
SFX 316 ur s .	38
SFX 316 ur ra .	39
SFX 316 ur ra .	40
SFX 316 ur ra .	41
SFX 316 ur i .	42
SFX 316 ur a .	43
SFX 316 ur a .	44
SFX 316 ur u .	45
SFX 316 ur u .	46
SFX 316 ur u .	47
SFX 316 ur a .	48
SFX 316 ur u .	49
SFX 316 ur a .	50
SFX 316 ur u .	51
SFX 316 ur u .	52
SFX 316 ur u .	53
SFX 316 ur a .	54
SFX 316 ur u .	55
SFX 316 ur a .	56
SFX 316 ur u .	57
SFX 316 ur u .	58
SFX 316 ur u .	59
SFX 316 ur a .	60
SFX 316 ur u .	61
SFX 316 ur a .	62
SFX 316 ur u .	63
SFX 316 ur u .	64
SFX 316 ur u .	65
SFX 316 góður betri .	66
SFX 316 góður betri .	67
SFX 316 góður betra .	68
SFX 316 góður betri .	69
SFX 316 góður betri .	70
SFX 316 góður betri .	71
SFX 316 góður betri .	72
SFX 316 góður betri .	73
SFX 316 góður betra .	74
SFX 316 góður betri .	75
SFX 316 góður betri .	76
SFX 316 góður betri .	77
SFX 316 góður betri .	78
SFX 316 góður betri .	79
SFX 316 góður betra .	80
SFX 316 góður betri .	81
SFX 316 góður betri .	82
SFX 316 góður betri .	83
SFX 316 góður betri .	84
SFX 316 góður betri .	85
SFX 316 góður betra .	86
SFX 316 góður betri .	87
SFX 316 góður betri .	88
SFX 316 góður betri .	89
SFX 316 góður bestur .	90
SFX 316 góður best .	91
SFX 316 góður best .	92
SFX 316 góður bestir .	93
SFX 316 góður bestar .	94
SFX 316 góður best .	95
SFX 316 góður bestan .	96
SFX 316 góður besta .	97
SFX 316 góður best .	98
SFX 316 góður besta .	99
SFX 316 góður bestar .	100
SFX 316 góður best .	101
SFX 316 góður bestum .	102
SFX 316 góður bestri .	103
SFX 316 góður bestu .	104
SFX 316 góður bestum .	105
SFX 316 góður bestum .	106
SFX 316 góður bestum .	107
SFX 316 góður bests .	108
SFX 316 góður bestrar .	109
SFX 316 góður bests .	110
SFX 316 góður bestra .	111
SFX 316 góður bestra .	112
SFX 316 góður bestra .	113
SFX 316 góður besti .	114
SFX 316 góður besta .	115
SFX 316 góður besta .	116
SFX 316 góður bestu .	117
SFX 316 góður bestu .	118
SFX 316 góður bestu .	119
SFX 316 góður besta .	120
SFX 316 góður bestu .	121
SFX 316 góður besta .	122
SFX 316 góður bestu .	123
SFX 316 góður bestu .	124
SFX 316 góður bestu .	125
SFX 316 góður besta .	126
SFX 316 góður bestu .	127
SFX 316 góður besta .	128
SFX 316 góður bestu .	129
SFX 316 góður bestu .	130
SFX 316 góður bestu .	131
SFX 316 góður besta .	132
SFX 316 góður bestu .	133
SFX 316 góður besta .	134
SFX 316 góður bestu .	135
SFX 316 góður bestu .	136
SFX 316 góður bestu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging lítill
SFX 317 N 119
SFX 317 ll l .	19
SFX 317 ll ð .	20
SFX 317 ítill itlir .	21
SFX 317 ítill itlar .	22
SFX 317 ll l .	23
SFX 317 ll nn .	24
SFX 317 ítill itla .	25
SFX 317 ll ð .	26
SFX 317 ítill itla .	27
SFX 317 ítill itlar .	28
SFX 317 ll l .	29
SFX 317 ítill itlum .	30
SFX 317 0 i .	31
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	32
SFX 317 ítill itlum .	33
SFX 317 ítill itlum .	34
SFX 317 ítill itlum .	35
SFX 317 l s .	36
SFX 317 0 ar .	37
SFX 317 l s .	38
SFX 317 0 a .	39
SFX 317 0 a .	40
SFX 317 0 a .	41
SFX 317 ítill itli .	42
SFX 317 ítill itla .	43
SFX 317 ítill itla .	44
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	45
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	46
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	47
SFX 317 ítill itla .	48
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	49
SFX 317 ítill itla .	50
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	51
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	52
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	53
SFX 317 ítill itla .	54
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	55
SFX 317 ítill itla .	56
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	57
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	58
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	59
SFX 317 ítill itla .	60
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	61
SFX 317 ítill itla .	62
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	63
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	64
SFX 317 ítill itlu .	65
SFX 317 lítill minni .	66
SFX 317 lítill minni .	67
SFX 317 lítill minna .	68
SFX 317 lítill minni .	69
SFX 317 lítill minni .	70
SFX 317 lítill minni .	71
SFX 317 lítill minni .	72
SFX 317 lítill minni .	73
SFX 317 lítill minna .	74
SFX 317 lítill minni .	75
SFX 317 lítill minni .	76
SFX 317 lítill minni .	77
SFX 317 lítill minni .	78
SFX 317 lítill minni .	79
SFX 317 lítill minna .	80
SFX 317 lítill minni .	81
SFX 317 lítill minni .	82
SFX 317 lítill minni .	83
SFX 317 lítill minni .	84
SFX 317 lítill minni .	85
SFX 317 lítill minna .	86
SFX 317 lítill minni .	87
SFX 317 lítill minni .	88
SFX 317 lítill minni .	89
SFX 317 lítill minnstur .	90
SFX 317 lítill minnst .	91
SFX 317 lítill minnst .	92
SFX 317 lítill minnstir .	93
SFX 317 lítill minnstar .	94
SFX 317 lítill minnst .	95
SFX 317 lítill minnstan .	96
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	97
SFX 317 lítill minnst .	98
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	99
SFX 317 lítill minnstar .	100
SFX 317 lítill minnst .	101
SFX 317 lítill minnstum .	102
SFX 317 lítill minnstri .	103
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	104
SFX 317 lítill minnstum .	105
SFX 317 lítill minnstum .	106
SFX 317 lítill minnstum .	107
SFX 317 lítill minnsts .	108
SFX 317 lítill minnstrar .	109
SFX 317 lítill minnsts .	110
SFX 317 lítill minnstra .	111
SFX 317 lítill minnstra .	112
SFX 317 lítill minnstra .	113
SFX 317 lítill minnsti .	114
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	115
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	116
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	117
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	118
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	119
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	120
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	121
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	122
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	123
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	124
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	125
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	126
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	127
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	128
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	129
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	130
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	131
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	132
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	133
SFX 317 lítill minnsta .	134
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	135
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	136
SFX 317 lítill minnstu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging ri
SFX 318 N 23
SFX 318 i i .	43
SFX 318 i a .	44
SFX 318 i i .	45
SFX 318 i i .	46
SFX 318 i i .	47
SFX 318 i i .	48
SFX 318 i i .	49
SFX 318 i a .	50
SFX 318 i i .	51
SFX 318 i i .	52
SFX 318 i i .	53
SFX 318 i i .	54
SFX 318 i i .	55
SFX 318 i a .	56
SFX 318 i i .	57
SFX 318 i i .	58
SFX 318 i i .	59
SFX 318 i i .	60
SFX 318 i i .	61
SFX 318 i a .	62
SFX 318 i i .	63
SFX 318 i i .	64
SFX 318 i i .	65
